en: Soy steak, Soy burger
fi: Soijapihvi
fr: Galettes de soja, steaks de soja, Escalope végétale, Steak à base de soja
hr: Odrezak od soje
nl: Sojasteaks
pl: Kotlety sojowe, Steki sojowe

en: Tofu patties
fr: Galettes de tofu, steaks de tofu
hr: Pljeskavice od tofua
pl: Kotlety z tofu

en: Cereals and vegetables patties, Cereal patty (without soybean)
fr: Galettes de céréales aux légumes, Galette de céréales aux légumes (sans soja) préemballé
hr: Pljeskavice od žitarica i povrća
pl: Kotlety z warzyw i zbóż, Kotlety zbożowo-warzywne

en: Frozen vegetarian patties, frozen vegetarian steaks
fr: Galettes végétariennes surgelées, Steaks végétariens surgelés

en: Red bean patties
fr: Galettes aux haricots rouges

en: Seitan patties
fr: Galettes au seitan

en: Vegetarian sausages
da: Vegetariske pølser
de: Vegetarische Würste
es: Salchichas vegetales
fi: Kasvismakkarat
fr: Saucisses végétariennes
hr: Vegetarijanske kobasice
it: Salsicce vegetariane
nl: Vegetarische worstjes
pl: Kiełbasy wegetariańskie
sv: Vegetarianska korvar, Vegetariska korvar

en: Vegan sausages, Plant-based sausages
da: Plantebaserede pølser, Veganske pølser
fr: Saucisses végétales, Saucisse végétale
pl: Kiełbasy wegańskie, Kiełbaski wegańskie
sv: Växtbaserade korvar, Veganska korvar

en: Vegetarian hot dog sausages
de: Vegetarische Hot-Dog-Würstchen
es: Salchichas vegetales para perritos calientes, Salchichas vegetales para hot dogs
fr: Saucisses végétariennes pour hot-dog, Saucisses végétales pour hot-dog
hr: Vegetarijanske hrenovke
nl: Vegetarische worstjes voor hotdogs
pl: Parówki wegetariańskie

en: Vegan hot dog sausages, Vegan hot dog saucages
da: Plante-baserede hotdog-pølser, Veganske hotdog-pølser
pl: Parówki wegańskie
sv: Växtbaserade varmkorv-korvar

en: Vegetarian frankfurter sausages, Vegetarian Frankfurt sausages, Vegetarian Frankfurter Würstchen
da: Vegetariske frankfurtere
de: Vegetarische Frankfurter
fr: Saucisses végétariennes de Francfort
hr: Vegetarijanske frankfurtske kobasice
nl: Vegetarische Frankfurterworstjes
pl: Frankfurterki wegetariańskie
sv: Vegetarianska frankfurter-korvar, Vegetariska frankfurter-korvar

en: Plant-based frankfurter sausages, Vegan Frankfurt sausages, Vegan Frankfurter Würstchen
da: Plantebaserede frankfurtere, Veganske frankfurtere
de: Veganes Frankfurter
es: Salchichas vegetales de tipo Frankfurt, Salchichas veganos de tipo Frankfurt
fr: Saucisses végétales de Francfort
hr: Veganski frankfurtske kobasice
nl: Veganistische Frankfurterworstjes
pl: Frankfurterki wegańskie
sv: Växtbaserade frankfurter-korvar, Veganska frankfurter-korvar

en: Vegetarian Vienna sausages
de: Vegetarische Fleische, Fleischersatz
es: Salchichas vegetales de tipo Viena
fr: Saucisses végétariennes de Vienne, saucisses végétales de Vienne
hr: Vegetarijanske bečke kobasice
nl: Vegetarische weense worstjes

en: Plant-based bratwursts, Vegan bratwurst sausages
da: Plantebaserede bratwurster, Veganske bratwurstpølser
de: Veganes Bratwürste
sv: Växtbaserade bratvurstar, Veganska bratwurstar

en: Plant-based cabanossi-style sausages, Vegan cabanossi
da: Plantebaserede kabanospølser, Vegansk kabanos
sv: Växtbaserade kabanosser, Veganska kabanosser

en: Plant-based cheese sausages, Vegan cheese sausages
da: Plantebaserede ostepølser, Veganske ostepølser
sv: Växtbaserade ostkorvar, Veganska ostkorvar

en: Plant-based chorizos, Vegan chorizos
da: Plantebaserede chorizoer, Veganske chorizopølser
sv: Växtbaserade chorizos, Veganska chorizos

en: Plant-based grill sausages, Vegan grill sausages
da: Plantebaserede grillpølser, Veganske grillpølser
sv: Växtbaserade grillkorvar, Veganska grillkorvar

en: Vegetarian sausages from tofu, Plant-based sausage with tofu (not vegan)
da: Vegetariske tofupølser, Vegetariske pølser på tofu
fr: Saucisses végétariennes de tofu
hr: Vegetarijanske kobasice od tofua
pl: Kiełbasy z tofu, Kiełbaski z tofu
sv: Vegetarianska korvar på tofu

en: Vegan sausages from tofu, Plant-based sausage with tofu (vegan)
da: Plantebaserede tofupølser, Veganske pølser på tofu
fr: Saucisse végétale au tofu (convient aux véganes ou végétaliens) préemballée
sv: Växtbaserade tofukorvar, Veganska korvar på tofu